Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-424
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of section 28-419, 28-420, 28-422, or 28-423 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 84.